ja: ねじサイズ: M4; M5; M6; M8; その他
nl: Schroefdraadmaat: M4; M5; M6; M8; Overig
sv: Storlek på skruvmönster: M4; M5; M6; M8; Övrigt
pl: Rozmiar gwintu śruby: M4; M5; M6; M8; Inny
da: Gevindstørrelse: M4; M5; M6; M8; Andet
pt-BR: Parafuso, tamanho da rosca: M4; M5; M6; M8; Outros
hr-HR: Veličina navoja vijka: M4; M5; M6; M8; Ostalo
en: Screw thread size: M4; M5; M6; M8; Other
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на винта: M4; M5; M6; M8; Други
fi: Ruuvien kierteen koko: M4; M5; M6; M8; Muu
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος βίδας: M4; M5; M6; M8; Άλλο
ru: Размер резьбы винта: M4; M5; M6; M8; Другое
fr: Dimensions du filetage: M4; M5; M6; M8; Autre
th: ขนาดเกลียวสกรู: M4; M5; M6; M8; อื่นๆ
es: Tamaño de la rosca del tornillo: M4; M5; M6; M8; Otro
lt-LT: Varžto sriegio dydis: M4; M5; M6; M8; Kita
ko: 나사산 크기: M4; M5; M6; M8; 기타
zh-CN: 螺纹尺寸: M4; M5; M6; M8; 其他
zh-TW: 螺紋螺絲尺寸: M4; M5; M6; M8; 其他
tr: Vida diş ölçüsü: M4; M5; M6; M8; Diğer
ro-RO: Dimensiune a filetului șurubului: M4; M5; M6; M8; Altele
sl-SI: Velikost navoja vijaka: M4; M5; M6; M8; Drugo
hu: Csavar menetmérete: M4; M5; M6; M8; Egyéb
vi: Kích thước ren vít: M4; M5; M6; M8; Khác
cs: Velikost závitu šroubu: M4; M5; M6; M8; Jiné
pt-PT: Tamanho da rosca do parafuso: M4; M5; M6; M8; Outro
it: Taglia del thread della vite: M4; M5; M6; M8; Altro
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu skrutky: M4; M5; M6; M8; Iné
de: Gewindegröße der Schrauben: M4; M5; M6; M8; Sonstige
nb: Gjengestørrelse for skrue: M4; M5; M6; M8; Annet